New York, session 2025-2026, S9546.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new article 2 48 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 48 4 FAIR AND TIMELY PROCESS FOR SUSPENDING THIRD-PARTY SELLERS AND SELLER 5 PROFILES OF ONLINE MARKETPLACES 6 Section 1705. Definitions. 7 1706. Third-party seller and seller profile pre-suspension warn- 8 ing period. 9 1707. Third-party seller and seller profile suspension and 10 appeals processes. 11 1708. Enforcement and penalties. 12 § 1705. Definitions. As used in this article: 13 1. "Online marketplace" means any person or entity that operates a 14 consumer-directed electronically based or accessed platform that 15 includes features that allow for, facilitate, or enable third-party 16 sellers and/or seller profiles to engage in the advertisement, display, 17 sale, purchase, payment, storage, shipping, and/or delivery of a consum- 18 er product in New York state; and is used by one or more third-party 19 sellers and/or seller profiles for such purposes. 20 2. "Third-party seller" means any person or entity, independent of an 21 online marketplace, who sells, offers to sell, or contracts to sell a 22 consumer product in New York state through such online marketplace's 23 platform. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15192-05-6 S. 9546--A 2 1 3. "Seller profile" means any person or entity, independent of an 2 online marketplace, that uses an online marketplace to showcase or 3 otherwise advertise its business information in order to independently 4 solicit sales of consumer product. 5 4. "Consumer product" means any tangible personal property which is 6 advertised and/or distributed in commerce by a third-party seller or 7 seller profile through an online marketplace. 8 5. "Suspension" means action taken by an online marketplace to tempo- 9 rarily or permanently block selling privileges of third-party sellers or 10 seller profiles for alleged or actual policy or code of conduct 11 violations, performance issues, or account integrity problems, including 12 but not limited to product quality or authenticity, intellectual proper- 13 ty infringement, customer complaints or feedback, late shipments, 14 cancellations, pricing or listing issues, or customer service. 15 § 1706. Third-party seller and seller profile pre-suspension warning 16 period. 1. No online marketplace shall suspend a third-party seller or 17 seller profile without first providing a two-week warning period in 18 which the online marketplace: 19 (a) notifies the third-party seller or seller profile with reasonable 20 documentation and details related to any and all infractions used to 21 justify a particular suspension; 22 (b) allows the third-party seller or seller profile to offer any 23 defense or justification against alleged or actual culpability, as well 24 as the ability to cure any and all infractions that are used to justify 25 a particular suspension; and 26 (c) provides a reasonable response to any correspondence, communi- 27 cation, or outreach by a third-party seller or seller profile. 28 2. Such two-week warning period shall begin when an online marketplace 29 provides a third-party seller or seller profile with the notification 30 required in paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section and may be 31 extended at the online marketplace's discretion in order to allow the 32 third-party seller or seller profile to cure any and all infractions for 33 the purposes of avoiding such suspension. 34 3. Where an online marketplace reasonably believes a third-party sell- 35 er or seller profile is engaged in imminent illegal activity, fraud, 36 deceit, misrepresentation, or similar abuses or deceptive practices with 37 impending effects to consumers within the marketplace, such online 38 marketplace may limit the third-party seller's or seller profile's 39 account capabilities during such two-week warning period. 40 § 1707. Third-party seller and seller profile suspension and appeals 41 processes. 1. An online marketplace shall designate a representative to 42 liaise with a third-party seller or seller profile who is actively 43 suspended or pending suspension, as well as provide such represen- 44 tative's contact information to such third-party seller or seller 45 profile. Such representative shall be within the online marketplace's 46 decision making department for suspensions and shall maintain consist- 47 ent, direct communication with a suspended third-party seller or seller 48 profile to work to resolve the issue leading to suspension. 49 2. A suspended third-party seller or seller profile shall have the 50 right to appeal the determination of the online marketplace in seeking 51 account reinstatement. Such appeals shall be acknowledged by the online 52 marketplace within one week of the appeal being made. An online market- 53 place shall acknowledge and reasonably respond to a suspended third-par- 54 ty seller's or seller profile's appeal within one week of the appeal's 55 submission. S. 9546--A 3 1 3. Upon a final determination by the online marketplace to permanently 2 suspend a third-party seller or seller profile, the online marketplace 3 shall provide any and all documents and information detailing alleged or 4 actual infractions used to justify a particular suspension that have not 5 previously been shared with the third-party seller or seller profile as 6 set forth in section seventeen hundred six of this article, which may 7 additionally be utilized and considered for the purposes of any subse- 8 quent legal action or dispute resolution process. 9 4. An online marketplace is prohibited from seizing or holding a 10 suspended third-party seller's or seller profile's consumer products 11 that are otherwise unrelated to any and all infractions used to justify 12 a particular suspension. 13 5. A suspended third-party seller or seller profile shall have the 14 right to recall all consumer products from an online marketplace's 15 possession that are listed for sale through such online marketplace that 16 are otherwise unrelated to any and all infractions used to justify a 17 particular suspension. 18 6. An online marketplace is prohibited from holding or seizing funds 19 from suspended third-party sellers or seller profiles that were gener- 20 ated from sales of consumer products unrelated to any and all infrac- 21 tions used to justify a particular suspension. 22 § 1708. Enforcement and penalties. Any third-party seller or seller 23 profile who has been injured by reason of any violation of this article 24 may bring an action in such person's or entity's own name against an 25 online marketplace to enjoin such unlawful act or practice, an action to 26 recover such person's or entity's actual damages or fifty dollars, 27 whichever is greater, or both such actions. The court may, in its 28 discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not to exceed 29 three times the actual damages if the court finds the defendant willful- 30 ly or knowingly violated this article. The court may award reasonable 31 attorney's fees to a prevailing plaintiff. 32 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 33 have become a law.